test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-Clex_rastagas_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - rástágâš: # MLO, ok
    rástágâš+N+Sg+Nom: rástágâš
    rástágâš+N+Sg+Gen: rástágáá
    rástágâš+N+Sg+Acc: rástágáá
    rástágâš+N+Sg+Ill: rástágâžân
    rástágâš+N+Sg+Loc: rástágáást
    rástágâš+N+Sg+Com: rástágáin
    rástágâš+N+Sg+Abe: rástágááttáá
    rástágâš+N+Ess: rástágâžžân
    rástágâš+N+Par: rástágâžžâd
    rástágâš+N+Pl+Nom: rástágááh
    rástágâš+N+Pl+Gen: rástágái
    rástágâš+N+Pl+Acc: rástágáid
    rástágâš+N+Pl+Ill: rástágáid
    rástágâš+N+Pl+Loc: rástágáin
    rástágâš+N+Pl+Com: rástágáiguin
    rástágâš+N+Pl+Abe: rástágáittáá

  Noun - ruvduhâš: # MLO, ok
    ruvduhâš+N+Sg+Nom: ruvduhâš
    ruvduhâš+N+Sg+Gen: ruvduháá
    ruvduhâš+N+Sg+Acc: ruvduháá
    ruvduhâš+N+Sg+Ill: ruvduhâžân
    ruvduhâš+N+Sg+Loc: ruvduháást
    ruvduhâš+N+Sg+Com: ruvduháin
    ruvduhâš+N+Sg+Abe: ruvduhááttáá
    ruvduhâš+N+Ess: ruvduhâžžân
    ruvduhâš+N+Par: ruvduhâžžâd
    ruvduhâš+N+Pl+Nom: ruvduhááh
    ruvduhâš+N+Pl+Gen: ruvduhái
    ruvduhâš+N+Pl+Acc: ruvduháid
    ruvduhâš+N+Pl+Ill: ruvduháid
    ruvduhâš+N+Pl+Loc: ruvduháin
    ruvduhâš+N+Pl+Com: ruvduháiguin
    ruvduhâš+N+Pl+Abe: ruvduháittáá
    
  Noun - jyeˊmehâš: # MLO, ok
    jyemehâš+N+Sg+Nom: jyeˊmehâš
    jyemehâš+N+Sg+Gen: jyeˊmeháá
    jyemehâš+N+Sg+Acc: jyeˊmeháá
    jyemehâš+N+Sg+Ill: jyeˊmehâžân
    jyemehâš+N+Sg+Loc: jyeˊmeháást
    jyemehâš+N+Sg+Com: jyeˊmeháin
    jyemehâš+N+Sg+Abe: jyeˊmehááttáá
    jyemehâš+N+Ess: jyeˊmehâžžân
    jyemehâš+N+Par: jyeˊmehâžžâd
    jyemehâš+N+Pl+Nom: jyeˊmehááh
    jyemehâš+N+Pl+Gen: jyeˊmehái
    jyemehâš+N+Pl+Acc: jyeˊmeháid
    jyemehâš+N+Pl+Ill: jyeˊmeháid
    jyemehâš+N+Pl+Loc: jyeˊmeháin
    jyemehâš+N+Pl+Com: jyeˊmeháiguin
    jyemehâš+N+Pl+Abe: jyeˊmeháittáá
    
  Noun - umogâš: # MLO, ok
    umogâš+N+Sg+Nom: uṃogâš
    umogâš+N+Sg+Gen: uṃogáá
    umogâš+N+Sg+Acc: uṃogáá
    umogâš+N+Sg+Ill: uṃogâžân
    umogâš+N+Sg+Loc: uṃogáást
    umogâš+N+Sg+Com: uṃogáin
    umogâš+N+Sg+Abe: uṃogááttáá
    umogâš+N+Ess: uṃogâžžân
    umogâš+N+Par: uṃogâžžâd
    umogâš+N+Pl+Nom: uṃogááh
    umogâš+N+Pl+Gen: uṃogái
    umogâš+N+Pl+Acc: uṃogáid
    umogâš+N+Pl+Ill: uṃogáid
    umogâš+N+Pl+Loc: uṃogáin
    umogâš+N+Pl+Com: uṃogáiguin
    umogâš+N+Pl+Abe: uṃogáittáá
